Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5232.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 17-20-2.2 and 17-20-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-20 entitled
"Mail Ballots" are hereby amended to read as follows:
17-20-2.2. Requirements for validity of emergency mail ballots.
(a) Any legally qualified elector of this state whose name appears upon the official voting
list of the town or district of the city or town where the elector is so qualified is eligible to vote by
emergency mail ballot according to this chapter. Within twenty (20) days or less prior to any
election, the elector may obtain from the local board an application for an emergency mail ballot
or may complete an emergency in-person mail ballot application on an electronic poll pad at the
board of canvassers where the elector maintains his or her residence.
(b) The emergency mail ballot application, when duly executed, shall be delivered in
person or by mail so that it shall be received by the local board, or received electronically through
the portal established by § 17-20-2.3, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the last day
preceding the date of the election.
(c) The elector shall execute the emergency mail ballot application in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter.
(d) In addition to those requirements set forth elsewhere in this chapter, an emergency mail
ballot, except those emergency mail ballots being cast pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, in
order to be valid, must have been cast in conformance with the following procedures:
(1) All mail ballots issued pursuant to § 17-20-2(1) shall be mailed to the elector at the

state of Rhode Island address provided on the application by the office of the secretary of state, or
delivered by the local board to a person presenting written authorization from the elector to receive
the ballots, or cast in private at the local board of canvassers. In order to be valid, the voter must
affix his or her signature on the certifying envelope containing a voted ballot. In order to be valid,
all ballots sent to the elector at the board of canvassers must be voted in conformance with the
provisions of § 17-20-14.2.
(2) All applications for emergency mail ballots pursuant to § 17-20-2(2) must state under
oath the name and location of the hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, or similar institution
where the elector is confined. All mail ballots issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be delivered
to the elector by the bipartisan pair of supervisors, appointed in conformance with this chapter, and
shall be voted in conformance with the provisions of § 17-20-14.
(3) All mail ballots issued pursuant to § 17-20-2(3) shall be mailed by the office of the
secretary of state to the elector at an address provided by the elector on the application, or cast at
the board of canvassers in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence.
Any voter qualified to receive a mail ballot pursuant to § 17-20-2(3) shall also be entitled to cast a
ballot pursuant to the provisions of United States Public Law 99-410, the Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA).
(4) All mail ballots issued pursuant to § 17-20-2(4) shall be cast at the board of canvassers
in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence or mailed by the office
of the secretary of state to the elector at the address within the United States provided by the elector
on the application, or delivered to the voter by a person presenting written authorization by the
voter to pick up the ballot. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on all
certifying envelopes containing a voted ballot. In order to be valid, all ballots sent to the elector at
the board of canvassers must be voted in conformance with the provisions of § 17-20-14.2.
(e) The secretary of state shall provide each of the several boards of canvassers with a
sufficient number of mail ballots for their voting districts so that the local boards may provide the
appropriate ballot or ballots to the applicants. It shall be the duty of each board of canvassers to
process each emergency ballot application in accordance with this chapter, and it shall be the duty
of each board to return to the secretary of state any ballots not issued immediately after each
election.
(f) Any person knowingly and willfully making a false application or certification, or
knowingly and willfully aiding and abetting in the making of a false application or certification,
shall be guilty of a felony and shall be subject to the penalties provided for in § 17-26-1.
(g) An emergency mail ballot application may be completed in person using an electronic
LC000628 - Page 2 of 5

poll pad provided by the board of canvassers upon presentation by the voter of valid proof of
identity pursuant to § 17-19-24.2. Upon completion of the poll pad application, the voter shall be
provided with a ballot issued by the secretary of state and upon completion of the ballot by the
voter, the voter shall place the ballot into the state-approved electronic voting device, provided by
the board of elections and secured in accordance with a policy adopted by the board of elections.
17-20-3. Definitions.
(a) Wherever used in this chapter, every word importing only the masculine gender is
construed to extend to, and include, females as well as males.
(b) Whenever used in this chapter, “bipartisan pairs of supervisors” for primaries means a
supervisor representing the endorsed candidates and a supervisor representing a majority of
unendorsed candidates, and for nonpartisan elections and primaries means nonpartisan pairs of
supervisors.
(c) Wherever used in this chapter, “employed outside of the United States” includes any
person who is:
(1) Employed by any agency, department, or division of the United States government and
who, by reason of that employment, resides outside of the continental United States;
(2) Employed outside the territorial limits of the United States; or
(3) A spouse or dependent residing with persons so employed.
(d) Wherever used in this chapter, “services intimately connected with military operations”
includes members of religious groups or welfare agencies assisting members of the armed forces
who are officially attached to and serving with the armed forces and their spouses and dependents,
and the spouses and dependents of members of the armed forces and of the merchant marine;
provided, that the spouses and dependents are residing outside of the state with the members of the
armed forces, merchant marine, or members of the religious or welfare agencies.
(e) Whenever a signature is required by a voter in this chapter, “signature” also means the
voter’s mark if the person is unable to sign their name because of blindness, disability, or inability
to read or write, or by affixing the voter’s signature by a person providing assistance to the voter in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter.
(f) Whenever used in this chapter, “bipartisan” means not of the same recognized political
party.
(g) Whenever used in this chapter, “emergency” voting pursuant to § 17-20-2.2(g) shall be
construed to mean “early” voting.
SECTION 2. Chapter 17-19 of the General Laws entitled "Conduct of Election and Voting
Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
LC000628 - Page 3 of 5

17-19-24.4. Early voting.
(a) An early voting ballot application may be completed in person using an electronic poll
pad provided by the board of canvassers, upon presentation by the voter of valid proof of identity,
pursuant to § 17-19-24.2. Upon the completion of the poll pad application, the voter shall be
provided with a ballot issued by the secretary of state and upon completion of the ballot by the
voter, the voter shall place the ballot into the state-approved electronic voting device provided by
the board of elections and secured in accordance with the policy adopted by the board of elections.
(b) Early voting shall be limited to a total of ten (10) nonconsecutive days preceding
election day and shall include the weekend days immediately preceding the election and eight (8)
weekdays.
(c) As practicable, all the voter and election protections and procedures, provided by
chapter 19 of title 17 on election day, shall govern the prior ten (10) days of early voting.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000628
========
LC000628 - Page 4 of 5